Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 7. Forms

§ 12-4-701.
Duty to prepare and furnish.

The Wyoming attorney general shall prepare and furnish to each city, town and county a form for liquor licenses and malt beverage permits. A license on a form other than as prescribed by the attorney general is invalid.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 53-206; W.S. 1957, § 12-10; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-107; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1.

§ 12-4-702.
Signature and attestation; contents; display required.

Each license issued by a city or town shall be signed by the mayor and attested by the clerk. Each license issued by a county shall be signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners and attested by the county clerk.

The following shall be shown in each license:

The name of the licensee;

An address of the licensed building in which alcoholic or malt beverages may be sold;

The date of issuance;

The amount of the fee; and

That the fee has been paid.

Each licensee shall display his license in a conspicuous place in the licensed building.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87,§ 7; C.S. 1945, § 53-207; W.S. 1957, § 12-12; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-109; Laws 1978, ch. 51,§ 1; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(ii), substituted “An address of the licensed building” for “A description of the place”; and in (c), substituted “building” for “room.”